Massachusetts, session 194th, S1028.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 49 of chapter 234A of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022
Official Edition, is hereby amended by striking out, in line 10, the word “fifty” and inserting in
place thereof the following words:- one hundred.
SECTION 2. Section 50 of chapter 234A of the General Laws, as so appearing, is hereby
amended by striking out, in line 9, the word “fifty” and inserting in place thereof the following
words:- one hundred.
SECTION 3. Section 51 of chapter 234A of the General Laws, as so appearing, is hereby
amended by adding, in line 1, after the word “trial” the following words:- “or grand”.
SECTION 4. Section 51 of chapter 234A of the General Laws, as so appearing, is further
amended by striking out, in line 3, the word “fifty” and inserting in place thereof the following
words:- one hundred.
of 2

SECTION 5. Section 51 of chapter 234A of the General Laws, as so appearing, is further
amended by adding, in line 4, after the word “trial” the following words:- “or grand”.
SECTION 6. Said chapter 234A is hereby further amended by striking out sections 52 to
54, inclusive, as so appearing.
SECTION 7. Section 55 of chapter 234A of the General Laws, as so appearing, is hereby
amended by striking out, in line 15, the word “fifty” and inserting in place thereof the following
words:- one hundred.
SECTION 8. Section 55 of chapter 234A of the General Laws, as so appearing, is further
amended by striking out, in line 23, the word “fifty” and inserting in place thereof the following
words:- one hundred.
SECTION 9. Section 59 of chapter 234A of the General Laws, as so appearing, is hereby
amended by striking out in lines 12 - 13, the words “three hundred and fifty” and inserting in
place thereof the following words:- seven hundred.
SECTION 10. Section 59 of chapter 234A of the General Laws, as so appearing, is
further amended by adding, in line 16, after the word “court” the following sentence – The trial
court shall submit annual reports to the legislature on the amount of funds expended for juror
compensation and reimbursement, including funds disbursed pursuant to G. L. c. 234A, § 56.
of 2